src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON GUOMOJ !!= @CODE@ C-final with cg I-III: guomoj:guobbmu
           :»X4  DenominalNounsCONTR ;
           :»X4  DenominalAdjsContr  ;
           :%>X6 ÅLMÅJ-NE            ; ! III-I CG
           :%>X5 ILL-EVENCASE        ;
           :%>X4 N-EVENWEAKSTEM      ;
    +Sg+Nom:%>   PxV                 ;
       +Ess:%>n  K-CONS                  ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:%>   R                   ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>j  R                   ;

!!€gt-norm: ænoj # Contracted test
!!€ ænoj:            ænoj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ æddnuv:          ænoj+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ änoj:            ænoj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ äddnuv:          ænoj+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON SARVES !!= @CODE@ C-final with cg II-III. sarves:sarvvá
 :%>Q1 SARVES-NE           ;
 :%>X4 CONTR-OTH           ;
 :»X4  DenominalNounsCONTR ;
 :»X4  DenominalAdjsContr  ;

!!€gt-norm: moarmes # Contracted test
!!€ moarmes:            moarmes+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ moarmmáv:          moarmes+N+Sg+Acc


LEXICON SVÁLES !!= @CODE@ C-final with cg I-III. sváles:svállá (lºl)
           :»X4   DenominalNounsCONTR ;
           :»X4   DenominalAdjsContr  ;
           :%>X6  SARVES-NE           ; ! III-I CG
           :%>X4  ILL-EVENCASE        ;
           :%>X4  N-EVENWEAKSTEM      ;
    +Sg+Nom:%>X4    PxV                 ; !
       +Ess:%>X4n K-CONS                  ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:%>X4    R                   ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>X4j   R                   ;

!!€gt-norm: sváles # Contracted test
!!€ sváles:           sváles+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ sválláv:          sváles+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON GÅHKES !!= @CODE@ C-final with cg II-III with vowel harmony (a/á=å). gåhkes:gåhkkå. Presently only for "gåhkes".
 :e%>  SARVES-NE           ;
 :kå%> CONTR-OTH           ;
 :kå»  DenominalNounsCONTR ;
 :kå»  DenominalAdjsContr  ;

!!€gt-norm: gåhkes # Contracted test
!!€ gåhkes:            gåhkes+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ gåhkkåv:           gåhkes+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON SJUOKKAJ !!= @CODE@ sjuokkaj:sjuoggá. Presently only for "sjuokkaj".
 :a%>Q3 ÅLMÅJ-NE            ;
 :á%>X4 CONTR-OTH           ;
 :á»X4  DenominalNounsCONTR ;
 :á»X4  DenominalAdjsContr  ;

!!€gt-norm: sjuokkaj # Contracted test
!!€ sjuokkaj:            sjuokkaj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ sjuoggáv:          sjuokkaj+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON GISTÁ !!= @CODE@ gistá:gisstá. Presently only for "gistá".
     +Sg+Nom:%>Q1  K-VOW                   ;
!    +Sg+Nom:%>Q1  PxC                 ; !^P^ !Moved to CONTR-OTH
        +Ess:%>Q1n K-CONS                  ;
  +Cmp/SgNom:%>Q1  R                   ;
            :%>X4  CONTR-OTH           ;
            :»X4   DenominalNounsCONTR ;
            :»X4   DenominalAdjsContr  ;

!!€gt-norm: gistá # Contracted test
!!€ gistá:            gistá+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ gisstáv:          gistá+N+Sg+Acc

!! ###  Contracted stems sublexica
! --------


LEXICON SARVES-NE
     +Sg+Nom:s   K-CONS  ;
!    +Sg+Nom:s%> PxC ; !^P^ !Moved to CONTR-OTH
        +Ess+Use/NG:n   K-CONS  ;
  +Cmp/SgNom:s   R   ;


LEXICON ÅLMÅJ-NE
     +Sg+Nom:j   K-CONS  ;
!    +Sg+Nom:j%> PxC ; !^P^ !Moved to CONTR-OTH
 +Ess+Use/NG:n   K-CONS  ;
  +Cmp/SgNom:j   R   ;


LEXICON CONTR-OTH
              ILL-EVENCASE   ;
              N-EVENWEAKSTEM ;
    +Sg+Nom:  PxV            ; !
       +Ess:n K-CONS             ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:  R              ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:j R              ;

! ComSg may cause trouble, since there is a dummy for it


!! ## Px lexica
! --------

LEXICON NPxV
 @R.Px.add@ PxV ;

LEXICON NPxV-12
 @R.Px.add@ PxV-12 ;

LEXICON NPxV3
 @R.Px.add@ PxV3 ;

!LEXICON NPxNomPlV
! @R.Nom3Px.add@@R.Px.add@ PxNomPlV3 ;
! @R.Px.add@ PxNomPlV ;

LEXICON NPxCi
 @R.Px.add@ PxCi ;

LEXICON NPxC
 @R.Px.add@ PxC ;

LEXICON NPxCs
  @R.Px.add@ PxCs ;

!LEXICON NPxCc
! @R.Px.add@ PxCc ;

LEXICON OTH-ODDCASE_Px_flag !sublexica to get px flag for denominal and deverbal nouns
 @P.Px.add@ OTH-ODDCASE ;

! Denominal nouns
! ===============

LEXICON DenominalNounsMUORRA !Gives diminutive, and double diminutive
                           +Der2+Der/Dimin+N:X7sj        N-ODDCASE    ;
                           +Der2+Der/Dimin+N:X7tj        OTH-ODDCASE  ;
                 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:X7sj        R            ;
                 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgGen:X7tja       R            ;
                 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:X7tjij      R            ;
    +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom:X7tja»sj    K-CONS       ; !Dobbel diminutiv
           +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N:X7tja»ttja  GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ;
           +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Use/NG:X7tja»dtja  GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ; !Gives muoratjadtjaj and muoratjadtjan (ess), barely used.
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:X7tja»sj    R            ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgGen:X7tja»ttja  R            ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:X7tja»ttjaj R            ;


                           +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:sj        N-ODDCASE    ;
                           +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:tj        OTH-ODDCASE  ;
                 +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:sj        R            ;
                 +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgGen:tja       R            ;
                 +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:tjij      R            ;
    +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom:tja»sj    K-CONS       ; !Dobbel diminutiv
           +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N:tja»ttja  GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ;
           +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Use/NG:tja»dtja  GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ; !Gives muoratjadtjaj and muoratjadtjan (ess), barely used.
 +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:tja»sj    R            ;
 +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgGen:tja»ttja  R            ;
 +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:tja»ttjaj R            ;

LEXICON DenominalNounsTÁLLA !Gives diminutive, and double diminutive
                           +Der2+Der/Dimin+N:X7sj        N-ODDCASE    ;
                           +Der2+Der/Dimin+N:X7tj        OTH-ODDCASE  ;
                 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:X7sj        R            ;
                 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgGen:X7tja       R            ;
                 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:X7tjij      R            ;
    +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom:X7tja»sj    K-CONS       ; !Dobbel diminutiv
           +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N:X7tja»ttja  GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ;
           +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Use/NG:X7tja»dtja  GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ; !Gives muoratjadtjaj and muoratjadtjan (ess), barely used.
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:X7tja»sj    R            ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgGen:X7tja»ttja  R            ;
 +Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:X7tja»ttjaj R            ;

                           +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:Ø5sj        N-ODDCASE    ;
                           +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:Ø5tj        OTH-ODDCASE  ;
                 +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:Ø5sj        R            ;
                 +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgGen:Ø5tja       R            ;
                 +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:Ø5tjij      R            ;
    +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom:Ø5tja»sj    K-CONS       ; !Dobbel diminutiv
           +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N:Ø5tja»ttja  GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ;
           +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Use/NG:Ø5tja»dtja  GÅNÅGIS-EVEN ; !Gives muoratjadtjaj and muoratjadtjan (ess), barely used.
 +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgNom:Ø5tja»sj    R            ;
 +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/SgGen:Ø5tja»ttja  R            ;
 +Err/Orth+Der2+Der/Dimin+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:Ø5tja»ttjaj R            ;
