src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPxKin
ibmesasses+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ibmesasºse SARVES ;
irggesasses+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:irggesasºse SARVES ;
mannjesasses+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:mannjesasºse SARVES ;
moarssesasses+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:moarssesasºse SARVES ;
vivvasasses+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vivvasasºse SARVES ;
vuohppasasses+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vuohppasasºse SARVES ;
áhkkásasses+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:áhkkásasºse SARVES ;
áhkátjasses+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:áhkátjasºse SARVES ;
ænoj+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:æddnu GUOMOJ ; !
LEXICON NounPx
barggemiedaviepses+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:bargge#mieda#vieppse SARVES ;
bieles+N+CmpNP/Last+Sem/Plc:bielºle SVÁLES ;
bielletjuokkes+N+Sem/Sign:bielle#tjuogge SARVES ;
bierŋes+N+Sem/Part:bierŋŋe SARVES ;
bijllagárges+N+Sem/Dummytag:bijlla#gárgge SARVES ;
boatsoj+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:boahttsu GUOMOJ ; !
boatsoj+N+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:boahtssu GUOMOJ ; !
bádnegárges+N+Sem/Body:bádne#gárgge SARVES ;
bádnesváles+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:bádne#sválºle SVÁLES ;
báhkogárges+N+Sem/Txt:báhko#gárgge SARVES ;
báldes+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani-fish:bállde SARVES ; !
bálgesbieles+N+Sem/Plc:bálges#bielºle SVÁLES ;
bálggátsiekkes+N+Sem/Dummytag:bálggá#tsiegge SARVES ;
diermmerástes+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:diermme#rásste SARVES ;
dábmaboatsoj+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:dábma#boahttsu GUOMOJ ;
gerdaktjuokkes+N+Sem/Semcon:gerdak#tjuogge SARVES ;
gierggerástes+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:giergge#rásste SARVES ;
gistá+N+Sem/Clth:gisstá GISTÁ ;
guobmolákkes+N+Sem/Body:guobmo#lágge SARVES ; !
guomoj+N+Sem/Substnc:guobbmu GUOMOJ ;
gábmagasses+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Obj:gábmagasºse SARVES ;
gálles+v1+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gálºle SARVES ; !
gártjes+v1+N+Sem/State:gárttje SARVES ; ! Also ÅRES
gåhkes+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:gåhk GÅHKES ;
gånågisráppes+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:gånågis#rábbe SARVES ; !
gæhttjoboatsoj+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:gæhttjo#boahttsu GUOMOJ ;
hárjjesváles+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:hárjje#sválºle SVÁLES ;
hárses+N+Sem/Tool-catch:hársse SARVES ;
jalŋes+N+Sem/Dummytag:jalŋŋe SARVES ;
joavnes+N+Sem/Dummytag:joavnne SARVES ;
kánoj+N+Err/Orth+Area/NO+Sem/Dummytag:kánºnu GUOMOJ ; ! LOAN
lissjes+N+Sem/Dummytag:lisºsje SARVES ;
lásses+N+Sem/Plc:lásºse SARVES ; !
moarmes+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:moarmme SARVES ;
njunjes+v1+N+Sem/Plc:njunnje SARVES ; ! Also ÅRES
njuorges+N+Sem/Body:njuorgge SARVES ; !
oajvvetjuokkes+N+Sem/Semcon:oajvve#tjuogge SARVES ;
piánoj+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Tool-music+OLang/NOB:pi^ánºnu GUOMOJ ; ! LOAN
poasstasjiroj+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Txt:poassta#girºru GUOMOJ ; ! LOAN
ruojves+N+Sem/Dummytag:ruojvve SARVES ;
rájves+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:rájvve SARVES ;
rástes+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:rásste SARVES ; !
sabegasses+v2+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Obj:sabegisºse SARVES ;
sarves+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:sarvve SARVES ; !
sjuohpanasses+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Obj:sjuohpanasºse SARVES ;
sjuokkaj+N+Sem/Body:sjuogg SJUOKKAJ ; ! Part on the reindeer body
skuoggasváles+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:skuogga#sválºle SVÁLES ;
skádasasuoloj+N+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Plc:skádasa#suolºlu GUOMOJ ; ! Proper noun only or also?
snjutjeknjuorges+v2+N+Sem/Body:sjnjutjek#njuorgge SARVES ;
suoloj+N+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:suolºlu GUOMOJ ; !
sváles+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:sválºle SVÁLES ; !
sájttesváles+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sájtte#sválle SARVES ;
tjievres+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:tjievrre SARVES ; !
tjáhppisrástes+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:tjáhppis#rásste SARVES ;
tsiehkes+N+Sem/Sign:tsiehkke SARVES ;
viepses+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:vieppse SARVES ;
vuodobáhkogárges+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Part:vuodo#báhkko#gárgge SARVES ;
vuolldosarves+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:vuolldo#sarvve SARVES ;
vuornes+N+Sem/Dummytag:vuornne SARVES ;
várrebálges+N+Sem/Dummytag:várre#bálgge SARVES ;
åresmiedaviepses+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:åres#mieda#vieppse SARVES ;
værdátboatsoj+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:værdát#boahttsu GUOMOJ ; !ren som äter lav från fällda träd
